District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.01

Application.

(a)

The provisions in this subchapter shall apply to:

(1)

Each program within the Continuum of Care offered by the District of Columbia or by a provider receiving funding for the program from either the District of Columbia or the federal government, if such funds are administered, whether by grant, contract, or other means, by the Department of Human Services or its designee; and

(2)

Clients of programs covered under paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(b)

In multi-program agencies, the provisions in this subchapter shall only apply to those programs that meet the criteria in subsection (a) of this section and clients of those programs.

(c)

This section shall not be construed to expand or limit the requirements of any other provision of this chapter.

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 3, 52 DCR 8113
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-296, § 2(c), 54 DCR 1097
D.C. Law 16-296, made a technical correction that required no change in the text.
This section is referenced in § 4-751.01, § 4-754.31, and § 4-754.52.